Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.290

Appointment of classified employee to exempt position—Return to regular position.

Any classified employee having civil service status in a position may take an appointment in an exempt position in the same county and maintain the right to return to his or her regular position or to a like position at the conclusion of such appointment. Such employee must apply to return to classified service within thirty calendar days of:

(1) Termination of employment in such exempt position; or

(2) Termination of employment in any other exempt position in which the employee subsequently serves provided there was no break in service with the county of more than thirty calendar days.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 153 s 5.]